Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB249.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) There is established a comprehensive fetal alcohol
spectrum disorders (FASD) awareness, prevention, identification,
intervention and service delivery program for the state Kansas. Such
program's responsibilities may include, but not be limited to:
(1) Designating an FASD state coordinator with knowledge and
experience in the field of prenatal alcohol exposure and FASD;
(2) utilizing and adapting existing federal or state programs to include
FASD identification and FASD-informed support;
(3) developing and expanding screening and diagnostic capacity for
FASD;
(4) developing, implementing and evaluating targeted FASD-
informed intervention programs for FASD;
(5) increasing awareness of FASD;
(6) providing training with respect to FASD for professionals across
relevant sectors; and
(7) serving as a centralized resource for issues related to FASD and
disseminating information about FASD and support services to affected
individuals and their families.
(b) The governor shall designate the department of health and
environment as the sole agency responsible for the administration of the
program established under this section.
(c) An FASD task force is hereby established to provide guidance for
the FASD state program, prevent FASD and provide for the identification,
treatment and support of individuals with FASD and their families.
Activities of the task force may include:
(1) Developing a statewide strategic plan to substantially reduce
prenatal alcohol exposure and provide for the identification, treatment and
support of individuals with FASD and their families;
(2) providing guidance on the implementation of such plan by

SB 249 2
reviewing and commenting on grant proposals addressing prenatal alcohol
and substance exposure and FASD-informed supports and interventions;
(3) identifying existing federal or state agency programs related to
prenatal alcohol and substance exposure and FASD and making
recommendations for the utilization and adaption of such programs to
include prenatal alcohol screening and FASD-informed supports and
interventions; and
(4) reviewing programs of state agencies that relate to prenatal
alcohol or substance exposure and FASD and coordinating such programs
that are interdepartmental in nature pursuant to an interagency agreement
whenever feasible.
(d) (1) The FASD advisory task force shall consist of:
(A) The secretaries of the department of health and environment, the
department of corrections, the department for children and families, the
department of commerce and the board of education, or their designees;
and
(B) eight members from the public, representing health, education
and criminal justice professionals, service providers, tribal populations and
at least three individuals with FASD or their family members, all of whom
shall be appointed by the governor.
(2) Terms, compensation, removal and filling of vacancies of
appointed members shall be governed by the department of health and
environment. The task force shall elect a chair from its membership to
serve a two-year term. All members shall be appointed prior to October 1,
2025.
(3) Members of the task force attending meetings authorized by the
task force shall be paid amounts as provided in K.S.A. 75-3223(e), and
amendments thereto.
(e) The secretary of health and environment shall designate an FASD
state coordinator to provide administrative support for the task force.
Administrative support may include personnel, budget, payroll and
contract administration. The task force shall adopt an annual budget and
work program.
(f) (1) The task force shall report from time to time on its activities to
the governor, the legislature and the department of health and
environment.
(2) Beginning in 2026, the task force shall file a formal report with
the governor not later than October 15 of each even-numbered year so that
the information contained in the report, including recommendations, can
be included in the governor's budget message to the legislature.
(3) Beginning in 2027, the task force shall also submit a report to the
house standing committee on health and human services and the senate
standing committee on public health and welfare, or their successor

SB 249 3
committees, not later than the first day of the regular legislative session of
each odd-numbered year.
(g) The department of health and environment may apply for, receive
and disburse federal funds made available to the state by federal law or
rules adopted for any purpose related to the powers and duties of the
department. The department shall comply with any requirements of federal
law, rules and regulations to apply for, receive and disburse funds. The
department may contract with or provide grants to public and private
nonprofit entities for FASD programs set forth in this section.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.